Washington statutes.
RCW 19.116.080

Unlawful subleasing or transfer—Class C felony.

(1) Unlawful subleasing of a motor vehicle is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in a motor vehicle is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 157; 1990 c 44 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.